Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-609. Eligibility for compensation.

An individual is eligible to receive shared work unemployment compensation benefits with respect to any week only if, in addition to monetary entitlement, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that:

During the week, the individual is employed as a member of an affected group under an approved shared work compensation plan that was approved before that week, and the plan is in effect with respect to the week for which the benefits are claimed;

During the week, the individual is able to work and is available for the normal work week with the shared work employer.

However, an otherwise eligible individual shall not be denied benefits with respect to any week in which he or she is in training to enhance job skills, including employer-sponsored training and worker training funded under the Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq., if the training has been approved by the director.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, an individual is deemed unemployed in any week for which remuneration is payable to him or her as an employee in an affected group for ninety percent (90%) or less than his or her normal weekly hours of work as specified under the approved shared work compensation plan in effect for the week.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, an individual shall not be denied shared work unemployment compensation benefits for any week by reason of the application of provisions relating to availability for work and active search for work with an employer other than the shared work unemployment compensation employer.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 2013, No. 956, § 5; 2015, No. 907, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 281.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment
inserted (a)(2)(B); and redesignated (3) and (4) as (b) and (c).

The 2015 amendment substituted “Arkansas Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, § 15-4-3701 et seq.” for “Arkansas Workforce Investment Act, § 15-4-2201 et seq.” in (a)(2)(B).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-610. Amount of benefits — Filing of claims.

The shared work unemployment compensation weekly benefit amount shall be the product of the regular weekly unemployment compensation amount multiplied by the percentage of reduction of at least ten percent (10%) in the individual's usual weekly hours of work.

An individual may be eligible for shared work unemployment compensation benefits or unemployment compensation, as appropriate, except that no individual shall be eligible for combined benefits in any benefit year in an amount more than the maximum entitlement established for unemployment compensation, nor shall an individual be paid shared work unemployment compensation benefits for more than twenty-five (25) weeks, whether or not consecutive, in any benefit year pursuant to a shared work plan.

The shared work unemployment compensation benefits paid an individual shall be deducted from the maximum entitlement amount established for that individual's benefit year.

Claims for shared work unemployment compensation benefits shall be filed in the same manner as claims for unemployment compensation or as prescribed in rules by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 41; 2011, No. 861, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 826; 2019, No. 910, §
282.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment substituted “twenty-five (25)” for “twenty-six (26)” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (d).

11-10-611. Entitlement to benefits under certain conditions.

If an individual works in the same week for an employer other than the shared work employer, and his or her combined hours of work for both employers are greater than ninety percent (90%) of the normal hours of work with the shared work employer, he or she shall not be entitled to benefits under these shared work provisions or the unemployment compensation provisions.

If an individual works in the same week for both the shared work employer and another employer and his or her combined hours of work for both employers are equal to or less than ninety percent (90%) of the usual hours of work for the shared work employer, the benefit amount payable for that week shall be the weekly unemployment compensation amount reduced by the same percentage that the combined hours are of the usual hours of work.

A week for which benefits are paid under this subsection shall count as a week of shared work unemployment compensation.

If an individual, with the approval of the employer, did not work during any portion of the workweek, other than the reduced portion covered by the shared work plan, he or she shall not be disqualified for the absence or deemed ineligible for shared work unemployment benefits for that reason alone.

An individual who performs no services during a week for the shared work employer and is otherwise eligible shall be paid the full weekly unemployment compensation amount.

Such a week shall not be counted as a week with respect to which shared work unemployment compensation was received.

An individual who does not work for the shared work employer during a week, but works for another employer and is otherwise eligible, shall be paid benefits for that week under the partial unemployment compensation provisions of this chapter.

Such a week shall not be counted as a week with respect to which shared work unemployment compensation was received.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 11; 1995, No. 519, § 7.

11-10-612. Charging shared-work unemployment compensation.

Shared work unemployment compensation shall be charged to the employer's experience rating accounts in the same manner as unemployment compensation is charged under this chapter.

Employers liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall have shared work unemployment compensation attributed to service in their employ in the same manner as unemployment compensation is attributed.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n.

11-10-613. Extended benefits.

An individual who has received all of the combined unemployment compensation and shared work unemployment compensation available in a benefit year shall be considered an exhaustee for purposes of extended benefits, as provided under the provisions of §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543, and, if otherwise eligible under those provisions, shall be eligible to receive extended benefits.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 329, § 1; 1985, No. 813, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1104n.

Subchapter 7
— Contributions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1943, No. 135, § 2: Mar. 1, 1943. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the present future rates of unemployment contributions provided in Act 391 of 1941 have been found to be excessive so as to constitute a burden upon certain industries thus tending to retard the growth thereof and to make employment conditions therein unstable and uncertain and whereas, if such rates are reduced as herein provided such industries and employment therein will be stimulated thus resulting in the progress of such industries and stabilization of employment within the state which will promote the public peace, health and safety, the passage of this act is declared to be necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be effective from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1945, No. 8, § 2: Jan. 31, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared that due to the fact that serious confusion exists in the administration of the law under the present uncertainties and that such confusion is detrimental to the public peace, health, and safety an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1953, No. 162, § 22: July 1, 1953.

Acts 1955, No. 395, § 30: July 1, 1955.

Acts 1957, No. 133, § 2: Apr. 1, 1957.

Acts 1959, No. 238, § 2: approved Mar. 25, 1959. Emergency clause provided: “It having been determined by the General Assembly that the present necessity of keeping and preserving great numbers of inactive employer account files and other records is detrimental to and a burden on efficient administrative operation, and is unduly expensive; an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in force and take effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 93, § 13: July 1, 1963.

Acts 1965, No. 33, § 6: June 30, 1965. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is immediately necessary in order to obtain satisfaction of certain amounts due the Federal Government in connection with the unemployment compensation program. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage except Section 2 hereof which shall become effective and in full force from and after June 30, 1965.”

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 25: approved Feb. 3, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an unemployment crisis exists in this State and in order to give better protection to the unemployed and their families extended benefits of the unemployment insurance program should be made available and to alleviate as much as possible the suffering and distress caused by unemployment, it is necessary to work in cooperation with the federal government; and in order to receive the benefits of federal law and comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 91-373, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 329, § 14: Mar. 14, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Employment Security laws of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 609, § 19: Mar. 28, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the working and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 14: Jan. 30, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State of Arkansas are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the citizens of this State when they experience a period of unemployment and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 366, § 14: Mar. 17, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that various provisions of the Arkansas Employment Security Law of the State are in need of immediate clarification and revision in order to provide adequate protection to the employed and unemployed citizens of this State and that this Act is immediately necessary to accomplish this purpose. An emergency is, therefore, declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 376, § 21: approved Mar. 8, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to receive the benefits of Federal law and to comply with the mandate of the United States Congress as provided in United States Public Law 94-566 and in order to give better protection to the unemployed workers and their families, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, this Act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1977 (Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 4: Aug. 15, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to exempt coverage of city and county units of local government, or local school districts, from unemployment insurance coverage should the United States Supreme Court declare such coverage unconstitutional, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 492, § 18: Mar. 21, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 922, § 18: Apr. 16, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to clarify certain provisions of the Employment Security Law that may be subject to misinterpretation and in order to bring the said Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 94-566, P.L. 95-19, and P.L. 95-216 so that Arkansas employers and workers may receive the benefits of the said Federal Unemployment Tax Act, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 43, § 22: Feb. 10, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to restore and insure solvency to the State's unemployment insurance trust fund from which unemployment benefits are paid to unemployed Arkansas workers and in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 96-364 and P.L. 96-499 and with P.L. 95-524, 96-249 and 96-265 so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 482, § 41: Mar. 16, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to conform with P.L. 97-300 and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law in conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act as amended by P.L. 97-248 and to insure the future solvency of the unemployment insurance fund so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, Nos. 8, 9, § 34: Jan. 30, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended by P.L. 98-21 and P.L. 98-369, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 672, § 13: Apr. 7, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1083 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby delared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediately preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 753, § 30: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections to the Shared Work plan provisions which enable employers to avoid layoffs and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1989, No. 420, § 17: Mar. 8, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections, and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediately preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 48, § 13: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall take effect and be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1991, No. 100, § 58: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act should become effective at the beginning of the next fiscal year; that the next fiscal year begins on July 1, 1991 and this act may not go into effect until after July 1, 1991 unless an emergency is declared. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 6, § 21: Feb. 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and that Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 519, § 14: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 234, § 32: Feb. 21, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to correct certain inequities in the payment and in the denial of benefits to unemployed workers, to make needed technical corrections and to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2001, No. 964, § 2: March 20, 2001. Acts 2001, No. 1367, § 11: Apr. 5, 2001. Acts 2001, No. 1528, § 2: Apr 12, 2001. Acts 2001, No. 1628, § 2: Apr. 16, 2001. Emergency clauses provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Law into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and the Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1223, § 15: Apr. 10, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive the tax credits accorded by the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits when they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 902, § 15: Mar. 16, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act should go into effect as soon as possible to bring the Arkansas Employment Security Department into conformity with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended, so that Arkansas employers may continue to receive tax credits under the Federal Unemployment Tax Act and Arkansas workers may receive unemployment benefits whenever they are unemployed. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 490, § 18: Mar. 26, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to make needed technical changes; to enable the state to capture and utilize penalty and interest owing from claimants; and in order that the state might continue to be in compliance with the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, as amended. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 551, § 4: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the creation of the Department of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund and the Department of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund is necessary for the development of the workforce of the State of Arkansas and for the proper administration of the Arkansas Employment Security Law; that any delays in implementing these funds could cause irreparable harm to the administration of those programs; and that this act is necessary to achieve the purposes of those funds. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2011, No. 1040, § 5: Apr. 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that eligible persons might lose unemployment benefits or have benefits delayed without this act; and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment benefits and the continued provision of unemployment benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 956, § 10: Emergency clause failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

Acts 2015, No. 690, § 8: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits; that the state's unemployment insurance program must remain in conformity with federal law requirements; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would interfere with continued provision of benefits and services to eligible persons. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 892, § 8: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Arkansas workforce education operates within a variety of agencies without coordination, often with significant inefficiencies arising from overlapping and repeated programming; that this act will bring workforce education programs together under a single umbrella agency; and that this act is immediately necessary because the effectiveness of this act is essential to the operation of the programs for which appropriations will be provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this act could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 454, § 3: Mar. 13, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Workforce Services must ensure the prompt determination of claims for unemployment insurance benefits and the current stabilization tax set aside for the Department of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund is set to expire on June 30, 2019; that the state's unemployment insurance program must maintain proper authority to process claims for unemployment insurance benefits; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay would cause a potential service disruption for programs served by the Department of Workforce Services Training Trust Fund and Department of Workforce Services Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

11-10-701. Accrual and payment by employer.

Contributions shall accrue and become payable by each employer for each calendar year in which the employer is subject to this chapter with respect to wages for employment.

The contributions shall become due and be paid by each employer to the Director of the Division of Workforce Services for the Unemployment Compensation Fund in accordance with such rules as the director may prescribe and shall not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the wages of individuals in employment for the employer.

In the payment of any contributions, a fractional part of a cent shall be disregarded unless it amounts to one-half cent (½¢) or more, in which case it shall be increased by one cent (1¢).(c)(1) Determinations of liability are conclusive and binding unless within thirty (30) calendar days after the mailing date of the determination the employer requests an administrative determination of coverage under § 11-10-308.

(2)

However, if the director determines that the request for an administrative determination of coverage is not perfected within the thirty-calendar-day period as a result of circumstances beyond the employer's control, the director may consider the request as having been filed timely.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 138, § 11; 1963, No. 93, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 2015, No. 690, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 827; 2019, No. 910, §
283.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2).

11-10-702. Rate of contributions.

Each employer shall pay contributions equal to two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%) of wages paid by the employer with respect to employment, except as may otherwise be prescribed in § 11-10-703.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 138, § 12; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 11; 1983, No. 482, § 25; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108.